src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_VÄNKÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 k~g ä:e comparative
!!€  vänkä: vänkä+A+Sg+Nom # goofy
!!€  vänkää: vänkä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  vänkänä: vänkä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  vängässä: vänkä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  vängissä: vänkä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  vänkiin: vänkä+A+Pl+Ill
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:gä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:g  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:gä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:g  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MÄRKÄ

0  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

0  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

0:k  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:k  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;

0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:kä  ADJ_COMPOUND_0  ;

+Dial:j  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;

+Dial:jä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;

0:e  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;

+Dial:j  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

+Dial:je  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;


!!  p:m is missing from this a, ä stems.

LEXICON ADJ_KULTA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~l a:e comparative
!!€  kulta: kulta+A+Sg+Nom # dear
!!€  kultaa: kulta+A+Sg+Par
!!€  kultana: kulta+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  kullassa: kulta+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  kultina: kulta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  kullissa: kulta+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  kultien: kulta+A+Pl+Gen
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:la  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:l  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:la  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:l  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  T:l and t:n are missing from this a stem and t:l from ä stem.

LEXICON ADJ_LÄNTÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~l ä:e comparative
!!€  lyhyenläntä: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Nom # shorty
!!€  lyhyenläntää: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  lyhyenläntänä: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  lyhyenlännässä: lyhyenläntä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lyhyenläntinä: lyhyenläntä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  lyhyenlännissä: lyhyenläntä+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  lyhyenläntien: lyhyenläntä+A+Pl+Gen
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:nä  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:tä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:nä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:n  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_TURTA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 10 t~r a:e comparative
!!€  turta: turta+A+Sg+Nom # numb
!!€  turtaa: turta+A+Sg+Par
!!€  turtana: turta+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  turrassa:  turta+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  turtina: turta+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  turrissa: turta+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  turtien: turta+A+Pl+Gen
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ra  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:r  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ta  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:t  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ra  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ra  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  K:j is missing.

LEXICON ADJ_HAPERA
!!  Certain trisyllabic or longer a stems allow a lot of allomorphs and both
!!  a : o : 0 variations:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 11 back
!!€  hapera: hapera+A+Sg+Nom # brittle
!!€  haperia: hapera+A+Pl+Par
!!€  haperoita: hapera+A+Pl+Par
!!€  haperien: hapera+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperoiden: hapera+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperoitten: hapera+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperiin: hapera+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  haperoihin: hapera+A+Pl+Ill
!!  Also less commonly
!!€  haperojen: hapera+A+Use/Rare+Pl+Gen
!!€  haperoja: hapera+A+Use/Rare+Pl+Par
!!€  haperain: hapera+A+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
+Use/Rare:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
+Use/Rare:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;

LEXICON ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 11 front
!!€  höppänä: höppänä+A+Sg+Nom # senile
!!€  höppänää: höppänä+A+Sg+Par
!!€  höppänänä: höppänä+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  höppänässä: höppänä+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  höppäninä: höppänä+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  höppänien: höppänä+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  höppäniin: höppänä+A+Pl+Ill
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_SINGULARS  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ä  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ö  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_HARMAJA
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 12
!!€  harmaja: harmaja+A+Sg+Nom # ?
!!€  harmajaa: harmaja+A+Sg+Par
!!€  harmajana: harmaja+A+Sg+Ess
!!€  harmajoina: harmaja+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  harmajoita: harmaja+A+Pl+Par
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_LATUSKA
!!  Certain trisyllabic or longer a stems allow a lot of allomorphs and both
!!  a : o : 0 variations:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 12++
!!€  latuska: latuska+A+Sg+Nom # flat
!!€  latuskoita: latuska+A+Pl+Par
!!€  latuskoja: latuska+A+Pl+Par
!!€  latuskoiden: latuska+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  latuskoitten: latuska+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  latuskojen: latuska+A+Pl+Gen
!!€  latuskoihin: latuska+A+Pl+Ill
0:a  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  !Special illative gradation in a stems

LEXICON ADJ_HAILAKKA
!!  The a : o stem variation combines with trisyllabic class of special illatives
!!€gt-norm:  Adjectives 14 back
!!€  hailakka: hailakka+A+Sg+Nom # pale
!!€  hailakkoina: hailakka+A+Pl+Ess
!!€  hailakoissa: hailakka+A+Pl+Ine
!!€  hailakkoihin: hailakka+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  hailakoihin: hailakka+A+Pl+Ill
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
+Use/NG:o  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ka  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IN  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:a  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:o  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;
