src/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
hailakka+A:hailak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
haljakka+A:haljak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hanakka+A:hanak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hanakka+A:hanak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hapera+A:haper  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
harmaja+A:harmaj  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
hatara+A:hatar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
helakka+A:helak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hervakka+A:hervak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
hutera+A:huter  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
höppänä+A:höppän  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
itara+A:itar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kalvakka+A:kalvak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kanalja+A:kanalj  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kihara+A:kihar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
kikkara+A:kikkar  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kimakka+A:kimak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kinttana+A:kinttan  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kipakka+A:kipak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kippura+A:kippur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kirpakka+A:kirpak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kiverä+A:kiver  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
kuivakka+A:kuivak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
kukkura+A:kukkur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kulta+A:kul  ADJ_KULTA  ;
kupura+A:kupur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
kuulakka+A:kuulak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
lattana+A:lattan  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
latuska+A:latusk  ADJ_LATUSKA  ;
liehakka+A:liehak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
likomärkä+A:likomär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
likomärkä+A:likomär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
litimärkä+A:litimär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
litimärkä+A:liti#mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
littana+A:littan  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
lullukka+A:lulluk  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
luonnonkihara+A:luonnonkihar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
luonnonkihara+A:luonnon#kihar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
lupsakka+A:lupsak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
luulaja+A:luulaj  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
lyhyenläntä+A:lyhyenlän  ADJ_LÄNTÄ  ;
läpimärkä+A:läpimär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
läpimärkä+A:läpi#mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
lättänä+A:lättän  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
märkä+A:mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
märkä+A:mär  ADJ_MÄRKÄ  ;
napakka+A:napak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
nasakka+A:nasak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
navakka+A:navak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
pullukka+A:pulluk  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
punakka+A:punak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
purppura+A:purppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
railakka+A:railak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rapsakka+A:rapsak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rasakka+A:rasak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
ravakka+A:ravak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rehvakka+A:rehvak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
remakka+A:remak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
riehakka+A:riehak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
rivakka+A:rivak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
ropakka+A:ropak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
ruskeanpurppura+A:ruskeanpurppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
ruskeanpurppura+A:ruskean#purppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
rutakka+A:rutak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sikkara+A:sikkar  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
sirpakka+A:sirpak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sivakka+A:sivak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
solakka+A:solak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sujakka+A:sujak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
supukka+A:supuk  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
sutjakka+A:sutjak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
syndaktylia+A:syndaktyli  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
säkkärä+A:säkkär  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
tanakka+A:tanak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
terhakka+A:terhak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
tolvana+A:tolvan  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
tomera+A:tomer  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
topakka+A:topak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
tuliterä+A:tuliter  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
tumpula+A:tumpul  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
turta+A:tur  ADJ_TURTA  ;
valakka+A:valak  ADJ_HAILAKKA  ;
vanttera+A:vantter  ADJ_HAPERA  ;
veiterä+A:veiter  ADJ_HÖPPÄNÄ  ;
violetinpurppura+A:violetinpurppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
violetinpurppura+A:violetin#purppur  ADJ_HARMAJA  ;
vähäläntä+A:vähälän  ADJ_LÄNTÄ  ;
vähänläntä+A:vähänlän  ADJ_LÄNTÄ  ;
vänkä+A:vän  ADJ_VÄNKÄ  ;
